test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_UUHL_STEM_2_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - t'ahlgúuhl - ENGLISH : # CLASS_UUHL_STEM_2

     t'ahlgúuhl+V+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: t'ahlgúlga
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+SIMPLE+PRESENT: t'ahlgúlgang
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+DIRECT+PAST: t'ahlgúlgan
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NON_FACTIVE: t'ahlgúl.ang
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: t'ahlgúlgang
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL: t'ahlgúlganggang
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: t'ahlgúlgangang
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: t'ahlgúlgiinii
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: t'ahlgúlgaangaa
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: t'ahlgúlgaangaan
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: t'ahlgúlang k̲asa'áa
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEAR+FUTURE: t'ahlgúlang k̲asa'áang
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: t'ahlgúlang k̲asaasdláa
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: t'ahlgúlang k̲asaasdláang
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: t'ahlgúlgang'waa
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: t'ahlgúlgang'waang
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: t'ahlgúlgang'waa.ang
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: t'ahlgúlgang'anggang
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: t'ahlgúlgang'angang
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: t'ahlgúlang k̲asaa'áng
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: t'ahlgúlang k̲asaa'ánggang
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: t'ahlgúlang k̲asaasdlä'áng
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: t'ahlgúlang k̲asaasdlä'ánggang
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: t'ahlgúlgang'ang'waa
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: t'ahlgúlgang'ang'waang
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: t'ahlgúlgang'ang'waa.ang
